test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_bimisewanakid_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ibimisewanakidenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ibimisewanakidenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ibimisewanakidenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ibimisewanakidenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ibimisewanakidenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ibimisewanakidenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ibimisewanakidenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ibimisewanakidenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ibimisewanakidenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ibimisewanakidenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ibimisewanakidenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ibimisewanakidenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ibimisewanakidenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ibimisewanakidenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ibimisewanakidenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ibimisewanakidenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ibimisewanakidenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ibimisewanakidenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
